Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-504
State Fire Marshal; legal counsel; appointment by Attorney General; compensation.

The Attorney General may appoint a special attorney to assist and advise the State Fire Marshal. The attorney appointed for this purpose shall at all times be under the supervision of the Attorney General, who shall fix his or her compensation, which shall be paid wholly out of the State Fire Marshal Cash Fund.

Laws 1925, c. 183, § 4, p. 480;

C.S.1929, § 81-5504;

R.S.1943, § 81-504;

Laws 2004, LB 1091, § 12.